incubator/apertium-hi-en.hi.dix
    <pardef n="/शत्रु__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बहुओं</l>
          <r>शत्रु<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>शत्रुओं</l>
          <r>शत्रु<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>शत्रु</l>
          <r>शत्रु<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>शत्रु</l>
          <r>शत्रु<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>शत्रु</l>
          <r>शत्रु<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="घर__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रात__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गुडिय/ा__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाँ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऋतु__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कटु__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आल/ू__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुओं</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बह/ू__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुएँ</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुओं</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुयें</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लडक/ा__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गेह/ूँ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुँओं</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लोह/ा__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="गुडिया"><i>गुडिय</i><par n="गुडिय/ा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="विधाता"><i>विधाता</i><par n="कटु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आलू"><i>आल</i><par n="आल/ू__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लोहा"><i>लोह</i><par n="लोह/ा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="कटु"><i>कटु</i><par n="कटु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह</i><par n="गेह/ूँ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="रेडिओ"><i>रेडिओ</i><par n="कटु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋतु"><i>ऋतु</i><par n="ऋतु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लहू"><i>लहू</i><par n="कटु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लडका"><i>लडक</i><par n="लडक/ा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="रात"><i>रात</i><par n="रात__n"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रोध"><i>क्रोध</i><par n="कटु__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बहू"><i>बह</i><par n="बह/ू__n"/></e>
    <e lm="शत्रु"><i></i><par n="/शत्रु__n"/></e>
